fr: Volume de la chambre d'un bec de clarinette: Grand; Moyen; Petit; Autre
pt-PT: Tamanho da câmara da boquilha do clarinete: Grande; Médio; Pequeno; Outro
es: Tamaño de la cámara de la boquilla del clarinete: Grande; Mediano; Pequeño; Otro
zh-TW: 單簧管吹嘴內膛尺寸: 大; 中; 小; 其他
ru: Размер камеры мундштука кларнета: Большой; Средний; Малый; Другой
sv: Storlek på klarniettens munstycke: Stor; Medium; Liten; Annan
de: Größe der Kammer des Klarinettenmundstücks: Groß; Mittel; Klein; Sonstige
it: Taglia della camera del bocchino del clarinetto: Grande; Media; Piccola; Altro
da: Kammerstørrelse på klarinettens mundstykke: Stor; Medium; Lille; Andet
nl: Kamergrootte klarinetmondstuk: Groot; Medium; Klein; Anders
sk-SK: Veľkosť komory klarinetového náustku: Veľká; Stredná; Malá; Iné
pl: Wielkość komory ustnika do klarnetu: Duża; Średnia; Mała; Inna
th: ขนาดโพรงภายในปากเป่าคลาริเน็ต: ใหญ่; กลาง; เล็ก; อื่นๆ
hu: Klarinét fúvókájának kamramérete: Nagy; Közepes; Kicsi; Egyéb
tr: Klarnet ağızlığı hazne boyutu: Büyük; Orta; Küçük; Diğer
nb: Kammerstørrelse for klarinettmunnstykke: Stor; Medium; Liten; Annen
lt-LT: Klarneto kandiklio kameros dydis: Didelė; Vidutinė; Maža; Kita
ja: クラリネットマウスピースチャンバーサイズ: ラージ; ミディアム; スモール; その他
zh-CN: 单簧管笛头内腔尺寸: 大号; 中号; 小号; 其他
ko: 클라리넷 마우스피스 체임버 크기: 라지; 미디엄; 스몰; 기타
el: Μέγεθος θαλάμου επιστομίου κλαρινέτου: Μεγάλο; Μεσαίο; Μικρό; Άλλο
hr-HR: Veličina bačvice usnika za klarinet: Velika; Srednja; Mala; Ostalo
fi: Klarinetin suukappaleen kammiokoko: Suuri; Keskikokoinen; Pieni; Muu
vi: Kích thước khoang đầu thổi kèn Clarinet: Lớn; Trung bình; Nhỏ; Khác
en: Clarinet mouthpiece chamber size: Large; Medium; Small; Other
pt-BR: Tamanho da câmara do bocal do clarinete: Grande; Médio; Pequeno; Outro
bg-BG: Размер на камерата на мундщука на кларинет: Голям; Среден; Малък; Друго
cs: Velikost komory náustku klarinetu: Velká; Střední; Malá; Jiné
ro-RO: Dimensiunea camerei muștiucului de clarinet: Mare; Mediu; Mic; Altele
sl-SI: Velikost ustnika za klarinet: Veliko; Srednje; Majhno; Drugo